California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
 further review pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The order shall do all of the following:

(1) Indicate that the regulations are being adopted, amended, or repealed pursuant to this chapter.

(2) State that the order is being transmitted for filing.

(3) Request that the Office of Administrative Law publish a notice of the filing of the order and print an appropriate reference in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.   (AB 1795)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48002.5.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Carton” means a unit equivalent to 40 pounds of citrus fruit.

(b) “Mandarin citrus” means mandarins, including tangerines and mandarin hybrids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 365, Sec. 3.   (AB 1795)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48003.

(a) Every person acting as a handler of commodities subject to this chapter shall be personally liable for the payment of assessments and inspection fees. Any handler who fails to file the required assessment form or pay an assessment or inspection fee by the last day of the month immediately following the month in which the commodities were received shall pay to the secretary a penalty of 10 percent of the assessment, inspection fee, or the sum of both the assessment fee and the inspection fee, owed and, in addition, 1.5 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(b) It shall be unlawful for a handler to refuse to collect the assessments or remit the assessments and the proper
 forms required by this chapter.

(c) A handler shall not charge a producer an administrative fee for collecting or remitting an assessment.

(d) A producer who disputes the amount of the assessment may file a claim with the secretary. The producer shall prove his or her claim by a preponderance of the evidence.

(e) A producer may not bring a claim against a handler for damages, or otherwise, in connection with the assessment or the required deduction by the handler of the moneys owed to the producer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 260, Sec. 4.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Office of Farm to Fork [49000. - 49002.]

49000.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There are many Californians who lack adequate access to healthy food.

(b) The lack of access to healthy food falls disproportionately on disadvantaged urban and rural communities.

(c) These same communities also suffer from an increased rate of obesity, diabetes, and other chronic health conditions related to poor diet.

(d) Facilitating access to healthy food in these communities is needed to address the gaps in the food distribution system and help mitigate
 the health consequences of this inadequacy.

(e) There are many county, state, federal, and private organizations attempting to address this issue, but there is no state-level body charged with coordinating these activities.

(f) A state-level office, charged with coordinating and facilitating food access, can increase the effectiveness of ongoing programs and ensure that efforts and funding are not duplicated.

(g) The Department of Food and Agriculture is uniquely situated to administer this office because of the department’s knowledge of the agricultural industry, and its ability to bring farmers together with hunger relief organizations, partner agencies, schools, colleges, community organizations, and others to increase the availability
 of healthy food.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   (AB 2413)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49001.

There is hereby created in the department the Office of Farm to Fork. To the extent that resources are available, this office shall work with the agricultural industry, direct marketing organizations, food policy councils, public health groups, nonprofit and philanthropic organizations, academic institutions, district agricultural associations, county, state, and federal agencies, and other organizations involved in promoting food access to increase the amount of agricultural products available to underserved communities and schools in this state. The office, under the
 auspices of the department, shall do all of the following:

(a) Work with regional and statewide stakeholders to identify urban and rural communities that lack access to healthy food, determine current barriers to food access, and share information to encourage best practices.

(b) Coordinate with other local, state, and federal agencies to promote and increase awareness of programs that promote greater food access.

(c) Promote greater retail sale of healthy food in underserved communities, including promoting the acceptance of California Special Supplemental Nutritional Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) and CalFresh benefits at certified farmers’ markets, encouraging the development and sustainability of
 local policies that support urban agriculture, increasing the number and quality of food retail outlets in inner city and rural communities, and maximizing resources in the interest of increasing food access.

(d) Foster partnerships between community partners, including farmers, businesses, and nonprofit and philanthropic organizations.

(e) Identify distribution barriers that affect limited food access, including, but not limited to, shortage of food retail outlets, limited store capacity, high distribution costs, and lack of capital funding opportunities, and work to overcome those barriers through the following:

(1) Encouraging food hubs or other aggregation systems.

(2) Coordinating institutional food procurement and buying practices.

(3) Increasing access to information, technical assistance, and resources, including developing opportunities through the California Healthy Food Financing Initiative (Article 3 (commencing with Section 104660) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code) in the office of the Treasurer.

(f) Identify opportunities and provide technical assistance for collaboration between farmers, regional and local food banks, partner agencies, and nonprofit charitable organizations in the gleaning, collection, and distribution of agricultural products for the purposes of reducing hunger and increasing access to healthy foods.

(g) Identify informational resources and organizations to provide technical assistance on small scale and backyard farming, community gardens, and other agricultural products for residents of underserved communities.

(h) Identify opportunities for collaboration with community organizations, social services, and partner agencies to provide cooking and nutrition education classes to residents of underserved communities.

(i) Coordinate with school districts and representatives to do the following:

(1) Provide tools to facilitate relationships between local producers and school food procurement personnel, and encourage opportunities to incorporate best purchasing practices such as Good Agricultural Practices
 (GAP) certification and insurance.

(2) Increase the nutritional profile of foods provided in schools.

(3) Increase access to nutrition education programs and information in schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   (AB 2413)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49002.

(a) There is hereby created the Farm to Fork Account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund that shall consist of money made available from federal, state, industry, philanthropic, and private sources.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money deposited in the Farm to Fork Account is hereby continuously appropriated to the department without regard to fiscal years to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 583, Sec. 1.   (AB 2413)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program [49010. - 49016.]

49010.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Nutrition Incentives Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.   (AB 1321)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

49011.

The Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program is hereby established in the Office of Farm to Fork for purposes of encouraging the purchase and consumption of California fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables by directly linking California fresh fruit, nut, and vegetable producers with nutrition benefit clients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 442, Sec. 2.   (AB 1321)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

49012.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Consumer incentive program” means a program administered by a qualified entity that increases the purchasing value of a nutrition benefit client’s benefits when the benefits are used to purchase California fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables.

(b) “Nutrition benefit client” means a person who receives services or payments through any of the following:

(1) California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, as described in Section 123280 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) CalWORKs program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) CalFresh, as described in Section 18900.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) Implementation of the federal WIC Farmers’ Market Nutrition Act of 1992 (Public Law 102-314).

(5) The Senior Farmers’ Market Nutrition Program, as described in Section 3007 of Title 7 of the
 United States Code.

(6) Supplemental Security Income or State Supplementary Payment, as described in Section 1381 and following of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) “Qualified entity” means either of the following:

(1) A certified farmers’ market, as described in Section 47004, an association of certified producers, a community-supported agriculture program, as defined in Section 47060, a farm stand, as defined in Section 47050, or a nonprofit organization representing a collective or association of certified producers that is authorized by the United States Department of Agriculture to accept federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011) of Title 7 of the United States Code) benefits from recipient purchasers at a farmers’ market. Certified producers shall be
 certified by the county agricultural commissioner pursuant to Section 47020.

(2) A small business, as defined in Section 14837 of the Government Code, that sells California grown fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables and that is authorized to accept nutrition benefits from any of the programs listed in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 2.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

49013.

(a) The Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Account is hereby created in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to collect matching funds from the federal Food Insecurity Nutrition Incentive Grant Program (7 U.S.C. Sec. 7517), if available, and from other public and private sources, to provide grants under the Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program. The Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program shall provide
 grants upon the deposit of sufficient funds, including from a successful application of federal grant funding, if available, into the Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Account.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may provide grant funds to a grantee in advance of the expenditure of funds by the grantee for implementation of the Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program, instead of in the form of a reimbursement after the expenditure of funds for that program, in an amount equal to or less than 50 percent of the grant amount provided in the grantee’s grant agreement pursuant to subdivision (a) and Section 49014, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The grantee has declared an operating budget of no more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(2) The department makes a determination,
 based upon a request submitted by the grantee declaring hardship, that an advance payment is essential for the effective implementation of the Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program by the grantee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 3.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

49014.

The Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program shall be administered in accordance with all of the following:

(a) Subject to the regulations adopted by the National Institute of Food and Agriculture in the United States Department of Agriculture in accordance with the federal Agricultural Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-79), or any subsequent federal agricultural act, moneys in the
 Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Account shall be awarded in the form of grants to qualified entities for consumer incentive programs.

(b) (1) The Office of Farm to Fork shall establish minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants in consultation with the United States Department of Agriculture and other interested stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health, State Department of Social Services, organizations with expertise in nutrition benefit programs or consumer incentive programs, small business owners that may qualify as a qualified entity, and certified farmers’ market operators.

(2) The department shall not use more than one-third of the Nutrition Incentive Matching Grant Program funds for consumer incentive programs with qualified entities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (c) of Section 49012 that are not otherwise qualified pursuant to paragraph (1) of that subdivision.

(c) The department shall give priority in awarding grants to qualified entities based on, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The service of an area of population currently not being served by a consumer incentive program.

(2) The degree of the existence of the following demographic conditions and the character of the communities in which sales of California grown fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables are made to the public by authorized vendors operating in conjunction with a qualified entity:

(A) The number of people who are eligible for, or receiving, nutrition benefit program services.

(B) The prevalence of diabetes, obesity, and other diet-related illnesses.

(C) The availability of access to fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables.

(3) Demonstrated efficiency in the administration of a consumer incentive program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 4.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

49015.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Corner store” means a small-scale store or grocery store, either an independent store or a chain store, that sells a limited selection of foods and other products, and that is located in a low-income area or low-access area in a rural, urban, or suburban area or tribal community. “Corner store” includes, among others, stores that are not located on a corner and stores commonly referred to as convenience stores or neighborhood stores.

(2) “Low-access area” means a census tract in which there are significant barriers to accessing a supermarket or large grocery store, which may include, but is not limited to, a census tract with
 at least 500 persons or 33 percent of the population that lives more than one mile, for nonrural areas, or more than 10 miles, for rural areas, from a supermarket or large grocery store.

(3) “Low-income area” means a census tract in which the income of at least 20 percent of the population is at or below the federal poverty level by family size, or if the median family income of the population is at or below 80 percent of the median family income of surrounding census tracts.

(4) “Minimally processed prepared food” may include any food prepared using either of the following processes:

(A) Traditional processes used to make food edible or to preserve it or to make it safe for human consumption, for example, smoking, roasting, freezing, drying, and fermenting.

(B) Physical processes that do not fundamentally alter the raw product or that only separate a whole, intact food into component parts, for example, grinding meat, separating eggs into albumen and yolk, and pressing fruits to produce juices.

(5) “Qualified entity” means any of the following:

(A) A small business or corner store.

(B) A city, county, or city and county, or tribal government or tribal organization with representative low-income areas that contain small businesses or corner stores or that is qualified to provide technical assistance to applicant small businesses or corner stores.

(C) A nonprofit entity or tribal government that works with low-income populations or in low-income areas or low-access areas, and that would do any
 of the following:

(i) Apply for grants on behalf of a small business, corner store, or tribal members, or a collection of small businesses, corner stores, or tribal members.

(ii) Sell or donate California-grown fresh fruits, nuts, vegetables, and minimally processed prepared foods directly in low-income areas or low-access areas.

(iii) Provide technical assistance to applicant small businesses or corner stores.

(6) “Recipient” means a small business, corner store, city, county, city and county, tribal government or tribal organization, or other nonprofit entity that is provided funds pursuant to subdivision (c).

(7) “Small business” means a small business, as defined in Section 14837 of
 the Government Code, that is authorized to accept nutrition benefits from any of the programs listed in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 49012, and is located in a low-income area or low-access area.

(b) The Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program shall be created in the department upon the appropriation of funds, including from a successful application of federal grant funding, if available, by the Legislature for purposes of the Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program.

(c) (1) Upon an appropriation of funds as specified in subdivision (b), the department shall administer the Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program and, pursuant to the program, award grants to qualified entities. If a city, county, or city and county is awarded a grant pursuant to this subdivision, it shall provide grant funds or provide technical assistance, or both, to
 applicant small businesses and corner stores that are located in low-income areas or low-access areas. Notwithstanding any other law, the department may pay funds to a recipient in advance of the expenditure of funds by the recipient for implementation of the Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program, instead of in the form of a reimbursement after the expenditure of funds for that program, in an amount equal to or less than 90 percent of the grant amount provided in the recipient’s grant agreement.

(2) The department shall award funds to qualified technical assistance providers to provide assistance with grant implementation for program applicants who are not receiving assistance from another recipient. The department shall allocate at least 3 percent of the total amount appropriated to the department in each fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) to qualified technical assistance providers pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) When awarding grants, the department shall give priority based on, but not limited to, the prevalence of any of the following in the communities that would be served by the qualified entity:

(A) People who are eligible for, or are receiving, nutrition benefits from any of the programs listed in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 49012.

(B) People with diabetes, obesity, or other diet-related illnesses.

(C) Low availability of and access to fresh fruits, nuts, and vegetables.

(4) When awarding grants, the department shall consider giving priority to qualified entities based on, but not limited to, demonstrated efficiency and capability in the administration of
 a consumer incentive program, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 49012.

(5) The department may establish regulations, minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants to qualified entities, and may adopt any other regulations to implement and administer the Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program.

(d) A recipient shall be required to do all of the following:

(1) Use the grant funds provided pursuant to subdivision (c) to purchase an energy-efficient refrigeration or cold storage unit or units or to provide technical assistance, or both.

(2) Prioritize stocking the refrigeration unit or units purchased with Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program grant funds with California-grown fresh fruits, nuts, vegetables, dairy products, meat,
 eggs, and minimally processed prepared foods.

(3) Offer for sale fresh fruits, nuts, vegetables, and minimally processed prepared foods, including culturally appropriate foods, grown in California to the extent that is possible.

(e) A recipient shall be subject to reporting and auditing requirements, as determined by the department.

(f) A city, county, city and county, tribal government, tribal organization, or nonprofit entity that is awarded a grant pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and is providing grant funds to corner stores or small businesses to purchase refrigeration equipment may use up to 20 percent of Healthy Refrigeration Grant Program grant funds for technical assistance.

(g) Sections 9 and 42971 do not apply for a violation of
 this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49016.

The receipt of a grant under either program established in this chapter shall not preclude an entity from being eligible to receive a grant under the other program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 6.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Local, Equitable Access to Food Program [49020. - 49021.]

49020.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, the Local, Equitable Access to Food (LEAF) Program.

(b) Upon an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, the Department of Food and Agriculture, with support from the State Department of Social Services, shall establish a grant program designed to expand the use of EBT acceptance systems at California certified farmers’ markets or tribe-operated farmer’s markets on Indian reservations.

(c) The grant program described in subdivision (b) shall include both of the following:

(1) Grants to certified farmers’ market operators or farmers’ markets operated by tribal governments on Indian reservations to expand the use of EBT acceptance systems
 at farmers’ markets.

(A) A certified farmers’ market shall only be eligible for a grant pursuant to this paragraph if the certified farmers’ market operator is a local government, a certified producer, or a nonprofit organization.

(B) A certified farmers’ market may use grant funds received pursuant to this paragraph for any activities relating to expanding the use of EBT acceptance systems at farmers’ markets, which may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Scaling and improving EBT processes at existing certified farmers’ markets.

(ii) Establishing new certified farmers’ markets that accept payment via EBT cards, primarily in underserved communities, including, but not limited to, those in food deserts or with high CalFresh participation.

(iii) Operational services, which may include, but is not limited to, the hiring of individuals to operate the EBT acceptance systems and programs that expand the purchasing power of customers using CalFresh benefits at farmers’ markets. A certified farmers’ market may use grant funds to contract with a third party to operate an EBT acceptance system only if the third party is a nonprofit organization that is incorporated in California.

(iv) Technical assistance, which may include, but is not limited to, employing a third party nonprofit organization to provide any back-end assistance required to help make a certified farmers’ market a successful and effective EBT retailer.

(v) Educational and outreach activities promoting the ability to use EBT cards at certified farmers’ markets.

(C) If a certified farmers’ market
 uses grant funds to hire an individual, or to contract with a third party, to operate an EBT acceptance system, all of the following shall apply:

(i) The person operating the EBT acceptance system shall be available at all times the certified farmers’ market is open to the public.

(ii) Vendors at the farmers’ market shall not be charged a fee for the operation of an EBT acceptance system.

(iii) Vendors shall be reimbursed in full for purchases made using an EBT acceptance system at least once per month.

(iv) The person operating the EBT acceptance system shall be located in a central and highly visible area of the farmers’ market.

(v) The person operating the EBT acceptance system shall provide a monthly report to the department
 with the number of EBT transactions, the amount of CalFresh benefits distributed, and the amount of CalFresh benefits redeemed for each day that the farmers’ market operates.

(D) A certified farmers’ market that receives a grant pursuant to this paragraph shall annually submit a report to the department documenting the use of grant funds and demonstrating that grant funds were used to expand the use of EBT acceptance systems at the farmers’ market.

(2) Grants to nonprofit organizations to provide technical assistance to certified farmers’ markets on the implementation of high-quality EBT acceptance systems.

(A) A nonprofit organization shall only be eligible for a grant pursuant to this paragraph if it is incorporated in California.

(B) The Department of Food and Agriculture shall
 issue a request for proposals and shall award a grant to one nonprofit organization for each region. The department may award grants for multiple regions to the same nonprofit organization. In selecting grant recipients, the department shall consider demonstrated expertise, capacity, and geographic proximity to certified farmers’ markets.

(C) Nonprofit organizations that receive a grant pursuant to this paragraph may use grant funds to assist certified farmers’ markets in becoming authorized retailers under the CalFresh program, to request free point-of-sale terminals for certified farmers’ markets, and to advise certified farmers’ markets on best practices, including, but not limited to, practices that may help expand the purchasing power of CalFresh benefits at certified farmers’ markets, help to procure market scrip, and acquiring appropriate signage.

(D) Nonprofit organizations that receive a
 grant pursuant to this paragraph shall use grant funds to create materials that explain the EBT transaction process and shall translate those materials into every language spoken by at least 2 percent of the state’s residents.

(d) Of any appropriation made for the purposes of this chapter, the Department of Food and Agriculture and the State Department of Social Services shall not use more than 5 percent for administrative costs associated with the LEAF program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (SB 907)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49021.

Nine months after the Department of Food and Agriculture has issued sufficient grants to evaluate the program established pursuant to this chapter, the department shall submit a report to all appropriate legislative committees. The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) The number of grants issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 49020.

(b) The average amount of grant funds awarded.

(c) Geographical information for grantees.

(d) The number of grantees located in a food desert, as defined in Section 49015.

(e) Data for the 12 months prior to the grant’s implementation, if available, and
 annually thereafter for all of the following metrics:

(1) The total benefit dollars spent by CalFresh participants per market.

(2) The average total benefit dollars spent at markets in food deserts and in areas with high CalFresh participation.

(3) An estimate of the change in EBT use relative to the marketing and outreach efforts of grantees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (SB 907)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14.5. California Farm to School Act [49025. - 49025.8.]

49025.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Farm to School Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 6.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49025.5.

(a) The California Farm to School Program is hereby established, under the administration of the Office of Farm to Fork, for purposes of cultivating equity, nurturing students, building climate resilience, and creating scalable and sustainable change in the school food system.

(b) The California Farm to School Program shall do all of the following:

(1) Increase procurement of foods that are grown or produced in California and are whole or are minimally processed from food producers in California for school meal programs.

(2) Increase hands-on food education opportunities that engage pupils and connect the
 classroom with the cafeteria, such as activities in school gardens, on farms, in culinary classes, in settings that celebrate traditional foodways and cultivate food sovereignty, and through other experiential learning pathways.

(3) Use regional staff to provide technical assistance and resources, facilitate relationships between local producers and school personnel, and encourage opportunities to incorporate best practices related to scratch cooking, hands-on education, Good Agricultural Practices (GAP), food safety, infrastructure, climate-smart agricultural practices, certification, and insurance.

(4) Develop programming for the California Farm to School Program in consultation with the State Department of Education, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Public Health, and any other relevant departments as needed.

(5) Administer the California Farm to School Incubator Grant Program.

(6) Collect data to evaluate program goals and implementation progress.

(c) The office may implement initiatives under the California Farm to School Program, including, but not limited to, initiatives that do any of the following:

(1) Advance the California farm to school network.

(2) Facilitate a California Farm to School Interagency Working Group, including, but not limited to, all of the following state agencies:

(A) State Department of Education.

(B) California Environmental Protection
 Agency.

(C) California Health and Human Services Agency.

(D) Labor and Workforce Development Agency.

(3) Further workforce development and kitchen infrastructure.

(4) Expand youth leadership opportunities related to farm to school.

(5) Strengthen supply chain infrastructure and transparency related to institutional procurement.

(6) Support farm-to-institution projects that leverage the department’s expertise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 6.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49025.8.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement and administer the California Farm to School Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 84, Sec. 6.   (SB 172)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 18. FIELD CROPS, SEEDS, SEED POTATOES, ONE-VARIETY COTTON DISTRICTS, AND NURSERY STOCK GRADES AND STANDARDS [52001. - 53564.]



CHAPTER 1. Field Crops [52001. - 52100.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [52001. - 52006.]

52001.

As used in this chapter, “field crop products” includes grain crops, dry bean crops, seeds, forage crops, fiber crops, and other field crops and the manufactured products and byproducts of such field crops.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52002.

The director shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish, by regulation, uniform standards for field crop products which shall conform as closely as possible to those which are established by the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(b) Establish inspection districts within the state. If such a district is established, inspection service may be rendered in it in accordance with regulations which are adopted by the director.

(c) Establish, upon request, inspection stations at warehouses, docks, or industrial plants, which are within or without an established inspection district. The director may make special regulations which are applicable to each specific inspection station and the conditions under which it shall be established and maintained.

(d) Provide through the regularly established inspection district and stations, sampling, grading, inspection, weighing, and certification service for field crop products within the state or which are shipped into or through the state.

(e) Issue certificates as to quality, condition, and quantity of field crop or other agricultural products in accordance with standards which are established pursuant to this chapter, or any other standards which may be fixed by trade or contract and which do not conflict with official standards.

(f) Adopt regulations for sampling, grading, inspection, weighing, and certification for the purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(g) Fix fees for sampling, grading, inspection, weighing, and certification of field crop products, which fees in the aggregate shall pay the cost of services necessary to perform such sampling, grading, inspection, weighing, and certification. The director may collect such fees in advance of performing the services, but is not required to do so if in his opinion the benefits of such services would be lessened by such advance payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

52003.

The director may enter any place where field crop products are stored, shipped, or sold, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52004.

The director may, for the purpose of inspection and examination, break the seals of cars and after such inspection has been made shall securely close and reseal such doors as were broken open using a special seal which is provided by the department for the purpose. A record of all original seals broken, the date when broken, a record of all seals which were substituted thereafter, and the date and number of such seals shall be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52005.

Any railroad which delivers field crop products in cars at any place which is provided with inspection service pursuant to this chapter shall provide convenient and suitable sidetracks at such place as the director may designate, on which every car of field crop products which is delivered by them shall, upon arrival, be set and conveniently arranged for inspection, if such car of field crop products is to be inspected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52006.

The director may assess a penalty of 1.5 percent per month, or fraction thereof, on any fees owed to the department for services rendered under this chapter whenever payment is not received within 30 days after the date of the invoice. The penalty shall be added to the original fee. In no event shall the total penalty for any one billed service exceed 50 percent of the original amount due for that service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 996, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employees [52031. - 52031.]

52031.

The director shall issue to each employee who is authorized to grade, inspect, or weigh the products which are included under this chapter, except those products for which standards have been established pursuant to federal law, a certificate which shows such authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inspection, Grading, Weighing, and Certification [52061. - 52063.]

52061.

The director shall inspect, weigh, and grade upon request and certify to any interested party the quality, condition, and quantity of any field crop or other agricultural product under such regulations as he may prescribe. Certificates which are issued by authorized agents of the director are prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements which are contained in them. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof, but it does not apply in a criminal action.

Such inspection shall not be made or such certificates issued by any person not specifically authorized by the director in reference to any field crop product for which state standards have been established. Any person so authorized shall comply with the regulations adopted by the director relative to the certification of field crop products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

52063.

Any person that is aggrieved by the grading by any authorized inspector of any of the products for which standards have been established pursuant to this chapter may appeal to the director in accordance with such regulations as he may establish. If the appeal pertains to a commodity for which standards have been established pursuant to federal law, the appellant may appeal to the Federal Grain Inspection Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposition of Funds [52091. - 52091.]

52091.

Any money which is received under this chapter shall be paid monthly into the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Destruction [52100. - 52100.]

52100.
